Georgia, session 2025_26, HB620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The lives of millions of individuals are heavily reliant on life-saving therapies
derived from human blood plasma, emphasizing the need for a robust and inclusive blood
plasma collection infrastructure;
(2) The United States is home to a vast network of United States Food and Drug
Administration licensed blood plasma donation centers, which collectively facilitated
over 493 million plasma donations from 2007 to 2001, underscoring the critical role these
centers play in supporting healthcare in this country;
(3) Approximately 33 million liters of blood plasma are meticulously fractionated each
year, yielding essential therapeutic plasma proteins vital for a wide range of medical
H. B. 620
- 1 -

LC 57 0244
treatments, including emergencies related to uncontrollable bleeding, autoimmune
disorders, sickle cell disease, and various chronic conditions;
(4) The demand for therapies derived from blood plasma has surged dramatically over
the past two decades, driven by advancements in diagnosing rare diseases, elevated
standards of patient care, and enhanced patient access to innovative treatments, further
highlighting the need for increased representation in blood plasma collection efforts;
(5) Plasma-derived medicinal products (PDMPs) are indispensable in managing urgent
health crises tied to bleeding, autoimmune conditions, sickle cell disease, and chronic
health issues, and play crucial roles in treating patients with rare and life-threatening
illnesses, such as primary immunodeficiencies and hemophilia;
(6) Millions of donations are made annually at blood plasma collection centers
throughout the United States, revealing the essential contribution these local collection
sites make within the healthcare framework of this country and state and the pressing
need for more diverse representation in the industry;
(7) The global blood plasma market has achieved remarkable financial growth, reaching
approximately $30 billion in 2022, a significant increase from just over $5 billion in
2000, highlighting the enormous economic potential embedded within the plasma
industry;
(8) Sickle cell disease is a chronic, incurable genetic blood disease that
disproportionately affects individuals of African descent, with approximately 100,000
people in the United States and over 11,000 people in this state living with the condition;
(9) Sickle cell disease is most prevalent among individuals of African descent, with
approximately 90 percent of those affected identifying as such, emphasizing the
significant impact of this disease on communities of color;
(10) Therapeutic plasma exchange has been recognized as a potentially useful treatment
in resolving complications of sickle cell disease, including acute chest syndrome and
H. B. 620
- 2 -

LC 57 0244
hepatic crisis, highlighting the critical need for accessible and inclusive blood plasma
collection infrastructure;
(11) Dr. Charles Richard Drew, an African American pioneering figure in modern blood
banking and twentieth-century medicine, revolutionized blood plasma donation and
storage processes, fundamentally shaping the field as it is known today, and his legacy
serves as a powerful reminder of the importance of integration and representation in the
medical field; and
(12) Despite the significant contributions of individuals of African descent who comprise
over 86 percent of blood plasma donations nation wide, there are currently no plasma
collection centers owned by individuals from this demographic in this state, a glaring
disparity that underscores the need for awareness to promote a more representative blood
plasma industry that reflects the communities it serves.
SECTION 2.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
February 17 of each year is designated as 'Blood Plasma Donation Awareness Day' in
Georgia."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 620
- 3 -